Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1729.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.72, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Sale of cannabinoids derived from hemp. (a) Notwithstanding any other section of this chapter, a product containing nonintoxicating cannabinoids, including an edible cannabinoid product, may be sold for human or animal consumption only if all of the requirements of this section are met. A product sold for human or animal consumption must not contain more than 0.3 percent of any tetrahydrocannabinol and an edible cannabinoid product must not contain an amount of any tetrahydrocannabinol that exceeds the limits established in subdivision 5a, paragraph (f). (b) A product containing nonintoxicating cannabinoids, other than an edible cannabinoid product, may be sold for human or animal consumption only if it is intended for application externally to a part of the body of a human or animal. Such a product must not be manufactured, marketed, distributed, or intended to be consumed: (1) by combustion or vaporization of the product and inhalation of smoke, aerosol, or vapor from the product; (2) through chewing, drinking, or swallowing; or (3) through injection or application to new text begin nonintact skin or new text end a mucous membrane deleted text begin or nonintact skindeleted text end new text begin , except for products applied sublinguallynew text end . (c) No other substance extracted or otherwise derived from hemp may be sold for human consumption if the substance is intended: (1) for external or internal use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals; or (2) to affect the structure or any function of the bodies of humans or other animals. (d) No product containing any cannabinoid or tetrahydrocannabinol extracted or otherwise derived from hemp may be sold to any individual who is under the age of 21. (e) Products that meet the requirements of this section are not controlled substances under section 152.02. (f) Products may be sold for on-site consumption if all of the following conditions are met: (1) the retailer must also hold an on-sale license issued under chapter 340A; (2) products, other than products that are intended to be consumed as a beverage, must be served in original packaging, but may be removed from the products' packaging by customers and consumed on site; (3) products must not be sold to a customer who the retailer knows or reasonably should know is intoxicated; (4) products must not be permitted to be mixed with an alcoholic beverage; and (5) products that have been removed from packaging must not be removed from the premises. (g) Edible cannabinoid products that are intended to be consumed as a beverage may be served outside of the products' packaging if the information that is required to be contained on the label of an edible cannabinoid product is posted or otherwise displayed by the retailer. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.45, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Building conditions. new text end new text begin (a) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer must comply with state and local building, fire, and zoning codes, requirements, and regulations. new text end new text begin (b) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer must ensure that licensed premises are maintained in a clean and sanitary condition and are free from infestation by insects, rodents, or other pests. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.63, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Content of label; hemp-derived topical products. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end All hemp-derived topical products sold to customers must have affixed to the packaging or container of the product a label that contains at least the following information: (1) the manufacturer name, location, phone number, and website; (2) the name and address of the independent, accredited laboratory used by the manufacturer to test the product; (3) the net weight or volume of the product in the package or container; (4) the type of topical product; (5) the amount or percentage of cannabidiol, cannabigerol, or any other cannabinoid, derivative, or extract of hemp, per serving and in total; (6) a list of ingredients; (7) a statement that the product does not claim to diagnose, treat, cure, or prevent any disease and that the product has not been evaluated or approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration, unless the product has been so approved; and (8) any other statements or information required by the office. deleted text begin (b) The information required in paragraph (a), clauses (1), (2), and (5), may be provided through the use of a scannable barcode or matrix barcode that links to a page on a website maintained by the manufacturer or distributor if that page contains all of the information required by this subdivision. deleted text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.66, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Prohibitions. (a) A product sold to consumers under this section must not be manufactured, marketed, distributed, or intended: (1) for external or internal use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals; (2) to affect the structure or any function of the bodies of humans or other animals; (3) to be consumed by combustion or vaporization of the product and inhalation of smoke, aerosol, or vapor from the product; (4) to be consumed through chewing; or (5) to be consumed through injection or application tonew text begin nonintact skin ornew text end a mucous membrane deleted text begin or nonintact skindeleted text end new text begin , except for products applied sublinguallynew text end . (b) A product manufactured, marketed, distributed, or sold to consumers under this section must not: (1) consist, in whole or in part, of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance; (2) have been produced, prepared, packed, or held under unsanitary conditions where the product may have been rendered injurious to health, or where the product may have been contaminated with filth; (3) be packaged in a container that is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious substance that may render the contents injurious to health; (4) contain any additives or excipients that have been found by the United States Food and Drug Administration to be unsafe for human or animal consumption; (5) contain a cannabinoid or an amount or percentage of cannabinoids that is different than the information stated on the label; (6) contain a cannabinoid, other than cannabidiol, cannabigerol, or a cannabinoid approved by the office, in an amount that exceeds the standard established in subdivision 2, paragraph (c); or (7) contain any contaminants for which testing is required by the office in amounts that exceed the acceptable minimum standards established by the office. (c) No product containing any cannabinoid may be sold to any individual who is under 21 years of age.